Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 8 Incorporation of Banks and Trust Companies

Cross references.

Incorporation of Secretary of State corporations generally, §

14-4-21

et seq.

7-1-390.
Incorporators.

One or more natural persons 18 years of age or over may act as incorporators of a bank or trust company.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2815; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 7; Ga. L. 1931, p. 156, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-901, 109-101; Ga. L. 1935, p. 101, § 1; Ga. L. 1941, p. 312, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 249, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 501, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 463, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 7; Ga. L. 1972, p. 384, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 727, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1801, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-390.1.
Organization of bank or trust company as limited liability company; promulgation of rules and regulations governing.

Subject to the requirements and restrictions of this chapter including, but not limited to, deposit insurance requirements where applicable, a bank or trust company may organize as a limited liability company pursuant to Chapter 11 of Title 14.

The department shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with Code Section 7-1-3 specifying the conditions under which a bank or trust company may organize as a limited liability company.

To the extent the provisions of Chapter 11 of Title 14 are consistent with and not in conflict with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the department, such provisions shall apply to a bank or trust company that has organized as a limited liability company.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-390.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 4.

7-1-391.
Prohibition of promoters’ fees.

A bank or trust company shall not pay any fee, compensation, or commission for promotion in connection with its organization or apply any money received on account of shares or subscriptions, selling shares, or other services in connection with its organization, except legal fees, commissions or fees to disinterested third parties for sale of bank stock to others, and other usual and ordinary expenses necessary for its organization.

A majority of incorporators shall file with the department at the time of filing of the articles an affidavit:

Setting forth all expenses incurred or to be incurred in connection with the organization of the bank or trust company, subscription for its shares, and sale of its shares; and

Stating that no fee, compensation, or commission prohibited by subsection (a) of this Code section has been paid or incurred.

In the event of a violation of this Code section the department may disapprove the articles on account of such violation.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1802, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 7.

7-1-392.
Articles of incorporation; advertisement of articles or notice of application; naming registered agent.

The articles of incorporation shall be signed by each of the incorporators and shall set forth in the English language:

The name of the bank or trust company;

The street address and county where the main office will be located;

For institutions chartered after July 1, 1998, the name of the initial registered agent;

The street address where its initial registered office will be located;

A brief statement of the purpose or purposes for which it is incorporated, that it is incorporated under this chapter, and whether it shall be solely a bank, solely a trust company, or both a bank and trust company;

The term for which it is to exist, which shall be perpetual unless otherwise limited;

The aggregate number of shares which the bank or trust company shall have authority to issue, and:

If the shares are to consist of one class only, the par value of each of the shares; or

If the shares are to be divided into classes, the number of shares of each class, the par value of each share of each class, a description of each class, and a statement of the preferences, redemption provisions, qualifications, limitations, restrictions, and the special or relative rights granted to or imposed upon the shares of each class;

The name, place of residence, and post office address of each incorporator;

The name, occupation, citizenship, place of residence, and post office address of each of the first directors, which number shall not be less than five; and

Any provision not inconsistent with law which the incorporators may choose to insert for the regulation of the internal affairs and business of the bank or trust company.

It shall not be necessary to set forth in the articles any of the corporate or operational powers set forth in this chapter.

The incorporators shall file with the department the articles, together with the fee required by Code Section 7-1-862. Such filing shall constitute an application for a certificate of incorporation. Immediately upon the filing of the articles, the department shall certify a copy thereof and return it to the applicants, who shall, in conformity with Code Section 7-1-7 and on the next business day following the filing of the articles, transmit for publication a copy of the articles or, in lieu thereof, a statement in substantially the following form:

“An application for a certificate of incorporation of a (bank, trust company, or bank and trust company) to be known as the
_______________
and to be located at
_______________
in
_______________
County, Georgia, will be made to the Secretary of State of Georgia by (names and addresses of incorporators) in accordance with Chapter 1 of Title 7 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Financial Institutions Code of Georgia.’ A copy of the articles of incorporation of such proposed (bank, trust company, or bank and trust company) and the application have been filed with the Department of Banking and Finance. The following persons have been proposed as the initial directors: (names and addresses of proposed directors).”

to the newspaper which is the official organ of the county where the main office will be located. The articles or statement must be published once a week for two consecutive weeks with the first publication occurring within ten days of receipt by the newspaper of the articles or statement.

A registered agent shall be named for each financial institution that is a corporation, and each financial institution shall inform the department and the Secretary of State of its current registered agent.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2815, 2816; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 8, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 7; Ga. L. 1931, p. 156, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-901, 13-902, 13-903, 109-101, 109-102; Ga. L. 1935, p. 101, § 1; Ga. L. 1941, p. 312, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 249, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 193, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 501, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 463, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, §§ 7-9; Ga. L. 1972, p. 384, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 727, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1803, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 15; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 9/HB 184.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, “have been filed” was substituted for “has been filed” in the next to last sentence of the form in subsection (c).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, a colon was added at the end of paragraph (a)(7).

7-1-393.
Additional filings with department; fees.

The incorporators shall also file with the department:

Information desired by the department in order to evaluate the proposed institution which shall be made available in the form specified by the department;

The affidavit required by Code Section 7-1-391;

A certificate of the Secretary of State showing that the proposed name of the bank or trust company has been reserved pursuant to Code Section 7-1-131; and

Applicable fees established by regulation of the department to defray the expense of the investigation required by Code Section 7-1-394.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 8, § 4; Code 1933, § 13-904; Ga. L. 1955, p. 201, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 689, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 10; Ga. L. 1972, p. 727, § 2; Code 1933, § 41A-1804, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-394.
Investigation; approval or disapproval by department; abbreviated procedures.

Upon receipt of the articles and the filings and fees from the incorporators as required by Code Section 7-1-393, the department shall conduct such investigation as it may deem necessary to ascertain whether it should approve the proposed bank or trust company. The department shall approve the bank or trust company if and only if it determines in its discretion that:

The articles and supporting items satisfy the requirements of this chapter;

The convenience and needs of the public will be served by the proposed bank or trust company;

There is a reasonable promise of adequate support for the bank or trust company in the light of:

The competition offered by existing banks and trust companies and other financial institutions;

The previous financial history of the community as to banks, trust companies, and other financial institutions;

As to banks, the opportunities for profitable employment of bank funds as indicated by the average demand for credit, the number of potential depositors, the volume of bank transactions, and the businesses and industries of the community with particular regard to their stability, diversification, and size; and

As to trust companies, the opportunities for profitable employment of fiduciary or other representative services;

The character and fitness of the incorporators, of the directors, and of the proposed officers are such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant the belief that the business of the proposed bank or trust company will be honestly and efficiently conducted;

There has not been any material violation of Code Section 7-1-391, so that approving the articles would, in the opinion of the department, impair the policy manifested by that provision;

The capital structure of the proposed bank or trust company is adequate in relation to the amount and character of the anticipated business of the bank or trust company and the safety of prospective depositors;

In the case of trust companies, the proposed company will have sufficient personnel with adequate knowledge and experience to administer fiduciary accounts;

In the case of trust companies, the incorporators, directors, and proposed officers have satisfactory results from a fingerprint record check report conducted by the Georgia Crime Information Center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The department shall be authorized to obtain conviction data with respect to any person who is an incorporator, director, or proposed officer of the proposed trust company. Each incorporator, director, or proposed officer of a trust company shall provide express written consent to the department to conduct the criminal background check and to use all information necessary to run such check, including, but not limited to, a classifiable set of fingerprints. The proposed trust company shall be responsible for all fees associated with the performance of such criminal background check; and

In the case of trust companies, the incorporators, directors, and proposed officers have demonstrated financial responsibility, character, and general fitness. The department shall be authorized to obtain personal history and work experience and other information, including, but not limited to, independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681a(f), with respect to any person who is an incorporator, director, or proposed officer of the proposed trust company.

Within 90 days after receipt of the articles and the filings and fees from the incorporators as required by Code Section 7-1-393, the department shall approve or disapprove the proposed bank or trust company. In giving approval, the department may impose conditions to be satisfied prior to the issuance of a permit to do business under Code Section 7-1-396. If the department, in its discretion, shall approve the proposed bank or trust company with or without conditions, it shall deliver its written approval of the articles to the Secretary of State and notify the incorporators of its action, provided that if the approval of a federal public body is also required with respect to the bank or trust company, then the department may, at its option, withhold its written approval from the Secretary of State until such approval is given and may, at its option, withdraw its approval if the federal public body refuses to grant its approval to the bank or trust company. If the department, in its discretion, shall disapprove the proposed bank or trust company, it shall notify the incorporators of its disapproval and state generally the unfavorable factors influencing its decision. The decision of the department shall be conclusive, except that it may be subject to judicial review as provided in Code Section 7-1-90.

(b.1)

The procedure and criteria used in the review of a request to establish an additional banking location pursuant to Code Sections 7-1-601 and 7-1-602 may be streamlined and abbreviated as provided by departmental rule, regulation, or written policy.

Nothing contained in this Code section, Code Section 7-1-608, or Code Section 7-1-622 shall limit the authority of the department to approve the organization of a special purpose bank or trust company which does not do a general banking business with the public but is organized for the purpose of conducting a limited banking business which facilitates the economic, commercial, or export-import trade growth of this state. The department may establish, by rule or by condition to its approval of articles of incorporation of any special bank or of any credit card bank incorporated under the provisions of Chapter 5 of this title, such special provisions concerning distribution of ownership, composition of the board of directors, bylaws, or the conduct of corporate affairs for any such special purpose bank or credit card bank incorporated under the provisions of Chapter 5 of this title as it determines to be consistent with the special nature of such charters and their efficient operation and safe and sound banking practice; provided, however, that in no event shall fewer than a majority of the directors of such special purpose bank or credit card bank be residents of this state.

The department may utilize in its investigation process such reports from other bank supervisory agencies as are pertinent to the requirements of state law.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 119, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-905; Ga. L. 1949, p. 308, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 287, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 11; Code 1933, § 41A-1805, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 11; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 7; Ga. L. 1993, p. 511, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 16; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 10/HB 143; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 6/HB 185; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 7/SB 52; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, deleted “and” from the end of paragraph (a)(6), substituted a semicolon for the period at the end of paragraph (a)(7), and added paragraphs (a)(8) and (a)(9). The second 2019 amendment, effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, however, that in no event” for “provided, however, in no event” near the end of the last sentence of subsection (c).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “any person who” for “any person that” in the middle of the second sentence of paragraph (a)(8); and substituted “Section 1681a(f), with respect to any person who” for “Section 1681a(f) with respect to any person that” in the middle of the second sentence of paragraph (a)(9).

Cross references.

Unlawful acquisitions by bank holding companies, §

7-1-608

.

Provisions applicable to interstate acquisitions or mergers by bank holding companies, §

7-1-622

.

7-1-395.
Issuance of certificate of incorporation.

If the Secretary of State shall receive, with respect to the proposed bank or trust company:

The written approval of the department with a copy of the articles of incorporation attached;

An affidavit executed by the duly authorized agent or publisher of the newspaper in which publication of the articles or a summary statement relating thereto is required by Code Sections 7-1-7 and 7-1-392 stating that the articles or the summary statement have been published as required by those Code sections;

All fees and charges required by law and if, in addition, the name of the proposed bank or trust company continues to be reserved or is available,

the Secretary of State shall immediately issue to the incorporators a certificate of incorporation. The Secretary of State shall retain on file in his office a copy of the certificate, the articles, the department’s approval, and the publisher’s certificate.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 2816; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 8, §§ 6, 7; Code 1933, §§ 13-906, 13-907, 109-102; Ga. L. 1952, p. 193, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, §§ 12, 13; Code 1933, § 41A-1806, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 7.

7-1-396.
Effect of certificate of incorporation; permit to begin business.

As of the issuance of the certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State, the corporate existence of the bank or trust company shall begin and those persons who subscribed for shares prior to filing of the articles, or their assignees, shall be shareholders in the bank or trust company; provided, nevertheless, that the department shall have full authority to regulate and supervise the activities of promoters, incorporators, initially named directors, subscribers for shares, and all persons soliciting offers to subscribe for shares in any bank in formation under this chapter even though the corporate existence of the bank may not have officially begun and the bank in formation shall be considered a “bank” for those purposes. Persons named in the articles of incorporation and approved by the department as initial directors of the bank in formation shall not be considered agents or broker-dealers within the meaning of paragraphs (1) and (3) of Code Section 10-5-2.

The certificate of incorporation shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the bank or trust company has been incorporated; but proceedings may be instituted by the state to dissolve, wind up, and terminate a bank or trust company in accordance with Code Section 7-1-92 and other applicable provisions of this chapter.

Until receipt of a permit to begin business issued by the department, a bank or trust company shall not transact any business except such business as is incident to its organization or to the obtaining of subscriptions and payment for its shares and other securities.

The department shall issue to a bank or trust company a permit to begin business when:

Capital stock of the bank or trust company shall have been fully paid in, in cash, and in no event in an amount less than the minimum capital stock for banks or trust companies under Code Section 7-1-410, and, in addition, there shall have been paid in:

Paid-in capital in an amount not less than 20 percent of the capital stock; and

The proceeds of subordinated securities, if any, which were considered part of the capital structure of the bank or trust company by the department under Code Section 7-1-419 in giving its approval of the proposed institution;

All of the directors have taken the oath or affirmation required by Code Section 7-1-484;

The bylaws of the bank or trust company have been filed with the department;

The bank or trust company has designated its registered agent and registered office pursuant to Code Section 7-1-132;

The bank or trust company has been organized and is ready to begin the business for which it was incorporated;

All conditions imposed by the department in giving its approval of the proposed bank or trust company under Code Section 7-1-394 have been satisfied; and

The department has received an affidavit signed by the president or secretary and by at least a majority of the directors of the bank or trust company to the effect that all of the foregoing requirements of this subsection have been satisfied.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 8, §§ 7, 8; Code 1933, §§ 13-908, 13-909; Ga. L. 1963, p. 511, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, §§ 14, 16; Code 1933, § 41A-1807, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 23; Ga. L. 1977, p. 730, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, § 6; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 17; Ga. L. 2008, p. 381, § 4/SB 358; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 7/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added “and” at the end of subparagraph (d)(1)(A); deleted former subparagraph (d)(1)(B), which read: “An expense fund in an amount fixed by the department which shall not be less than 5 percent of the capital stock; and”; and redesignated former subparagraph (d)(1)(C) as present subparagraph (d)(1)(B).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation near the end of subsection (a).

7-1-397.
Organizational meetings.

After the issuance of the certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State, a first meeting of the shareholders may be held within this state at the call of the shareholders who were the incorporators, or a majority of them, for the purpose of adopting bylaws or for such other purposes as shall be stated in the notice of the meeting.

After the issuance of the certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State, an organizational meeting of the board of directors named in the articles shall be held within this state at the call of a majority of the directors for the purpose of adopting bylaws and of electing officers and for transaction of such other business as may come before the meeting. The directors who call the meeting shall give to each director named in the articles at least three days’ written notice of the meeting.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1808, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-398.
Liability for premature business.

Incorporators and other persons who organize a bank or trust company which transacts business before its capital stock and paid-in capital have been paid in shall be jointly and severally liable to depositors and other creditors to make good the amounts not paid in by subscribers or otherwise deficient. Such liability shall be deemed as an asset of the bank or trust company and may be enforced by it, its successors or assignees, or by a shareholder suing derivatively, or by a receiver appointed under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 18, § 6; Code 1933, § 13-1906; Code 1933, § 41A-1809, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 8/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “capital stock and paid-in capital” for “capital stock, paid-in capital, and expense fund as required by Code Section 7-1-396” in the first sentence of this Code section.